Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 106
FIDUCIARY BUSINESS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

11-106-101. Bank as fiduciary.

It shall be unlawful for a state bank to act as fiduciary, other than as escrow agent, unless it is authorized by its charter or amendments thereto to exercise trust powers.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1133, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-106-102. Investment power.

A bank acting as fiduciary shall have the same investment powers as an individual fiduciary under like circumstances.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1133, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-106-103. General fiduciary powers.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by statute, a bank acting as a fiduciary shall have all of the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities and be subject to the same obligations and duties as an individual fiduciary under like circumstances.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1133, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-106-104. Agency powers.

In addition to its other powers, any bank that is authorized to exercise fiduciary powers shall, upon proper qualification under this code, have the power to act as a fiduciary in any capacity. It may also act as registrar, transfer agent, or attorney-in-fact and have the power to receive, manage, and apply sinking funds.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1133, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-106-105. Substitution of Colorado bank or Colorado trust company.

In addition to the procedures initiated by an interested party concerning internal affairs of the party's trust pursuant to part 2 of article 5 of title 15, or procedures otherwise permitted by Colorado law, and unless a will, agreement, or trust instrument otherwise provides, a company may be substituted as fiduciary for all or a part of the fiduciary business of another company without court approval if:

The successor is a Colorado affiliate of the transferor and the boards of directors of the transferor and successor both adopt resolutions to cause the successor to be substituted as fiduciary for all or part of the fiduciary business of the transferor;

The transferor is discontinuing all or part of its fiduciary business and the boards of directors of the transferor and successor both adopt resolutions to cause the successor to be substituted as fiduciary for the fiduciary business of the transferor that is being discontinued; or

There is a merger or consolidation of the transferor and the successor, with the successor being the surviving entity, and the boards of directors of the transferor and successor both adopt resolutions to cause the successor to be substituted as fiduciary for all of the fiduciary business of the transferor.

If the boards of directors adopt such resolutions as provided in subsection (1) of this section and comply with the notice and delivery provisions pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the successor shall replace the transferor as fiduciary and shall be the successor fiduciary possessing all the rights, powers, and duties that were granted to or imposed on the transferor. Such rights, powers, and duties shall vest in the successor upon effectuation of the substitution, irrespective of the date on which the fiduciary relationship is established or of the date of any related written agreement establishing the fiduciary relationship or of the date of the death of any decedent whose estate is being so administered. Nothing in connection with a substitution affects a renunciation or revocation of any letters of administration or letters testamentary pertaining to a fiduciary relationship or a removal or resignation of the transferor as personal representative, trustee, custodian, or other fiduciary.

At least thirty days prior to the effective date of the substitution, a certified copy of the resolutions of the boards of directors of the transferor and successor shall be delivered to the division of banking, and a written notice of such substitution shall be delivered to each interested party. Delivery will be deemed to have occurred upon the earlier of actual delivery or three days after depositing such resolutions or notification in the United States mails, certified mail with return receipt prepaid. The effective date of the substitution as fiduciary for all or part of the fiduciary business, as set forth in the resolutions, shall be the date provided in the resolutions, which shall not be earlier than thirty days after the date of delivery in accordance with this subsection (3). If the resolutions provide no effective date, the effective date shall be thirty days after the date of delivery in accordance with this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1134, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended, (SB 18-180), ch. 169, p. 1192, § 4, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-106-106. Investment in securities.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and subject to the standard contained in sections 11-50-113 (2) and 15-1-304, C.R.S., a Colorado bank or trust company may invest and reinvest the assets that it maintains in its trust in the securities of any open-end or closed-end management investment company or investment trust registered under the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940", 15 U.S.C. sec. 80a-1 et seq., as amended. A Colorado bank or trust company shall be allowed to make such investment even if it exercises investment discretion as a fiduciary, custodian, managing agent, or otherwise with respect to the investment and reinvestment of assets that it maintains in its trust department. The fact that a Colorado bank or trust company, or any affiliate thereof, is providing services to the investment company or trust as investment advisor, sponsor, distributor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, or otherwise, and receiving reasonable remuneration for the services, does not preclude such bank or trust company from investing in the securities of such investment company or trust.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1135, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-106-107. Funds awaiting investment or distribution.

A bank's duties regarding the holding of uninvested or undistributed funds that are awaiting investment or distribution are governed by the "Colorado Uniform Prudent Investor Act", article 1.1 of title 15, C.R.S., the "Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act", part 11 of article 1 of title 15, C.R.S., and applicable standards and requirements imposed by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1467, § 17, effective July 1.